Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202023-1215
Council; members; expenses.

Members of the council shall serve without compensation, but they shall be entitled to reimbursement for expenses incident to such service on the council as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1980, LB 790, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 17.
January 1, 2021